North Carolina, session 2025, HB395.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. INFRASTRUCTURE AND SPECIFIC PROJECTS BY COUNTY
SECTION 1.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirteen million one hundred ninety-one thousand five
hundred dollars ($13,191,500) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a
directed grant to Swain County to be used as follows:
(1) One million ninety-three thousand five hundred dollars ($1,093,500) for the
Bryson City Fire Department as follows:
a. Five hundred five thousand dollars ($505,000) for a new water tanker.
b. Sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) for installation of fire alarm and
carbon monoxide detection systems to protect firefighters.
c. Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a generator and transfer
switch to maintain continuity of operations during power outages.
d. Forty-eight thousand dollars ($48,000) for replacement of three
existing apparatus bay doors.
e. Four hundred fifty thousand five hundred dollars ($450,500) to
complete replacement and repairs to Bryson City's out-of-service fire
hydrants.
(2) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for Bryson City water and sewer
infrastructure improvement.
(3) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for a multipurpose building to house the
emergency management departments, including fire, rescue, and law
enforcement.
(4) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for a communication tower that
would allow for better and more reliable communication during outages.
(5) Five hundred ninety-eight thousand dollars ($598,000) to replace equipment
and a fire engine for the Qualla Fire Department.
SECTION 1.2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of eighteen million six hundred one thousand five hundred
*H395-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
fifty-three dollars ($18,601,553) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide
a directed grant to Jackson County to be used as follows:
(1) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to renovate an existing
building for town offices, meeting and classroom space, and public facilities
in the Town of Dillsboro.
(2) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for new facilities for the Canada Fire
Department to include shelter, bunk space for personnel, and updated housing
for equipment and supplies.
(3) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for new facilities for the Cashiers Fire
Department to include shelter, bunk space for personnel, and updated housing
for equipment and supplies.
(4) Thirty-five thousand five hundred ninety-two dollars ($35,592) for a drone
with Flir capability, spotlight, and grappling hook to be housed at the
Cherokee Fire & Rescue Fire Station l.
(5) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for an addition and upgrade to the current
bus garage in Sylva for the Jackson County Public Schools.
(6) Three hundred fifteen thousand nine hundred sixty-one dollars ($315,961) to
purchase and upfit five new School Resource Officer (SRO) vehicles for the
Jackson County Sheriff's Office.
(7) One million dollars ($1,000,000) to install and maintain the stream gage in the
Town of Webster.
SECTION 1.3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of sixty-five million two hundred fifty-six thousand four
hundred dollars ($65,256,400) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide
directed grants to Transylvania County to be used as follows:
(1) Fifty-two million dollars ($52,000,000) to the Town of Brevard for
wastewater treatment.
(2) Eleven million nine hundred eighty-four thousand four hundred dollars
($11,984,400) to the Town of Rosman for water and sewer infrastructure.
(3) One million dollars ($1,000,000) to Cedar Mountain Volunteer Fire Rescue,
Inc., a nonprofit organization, for a new fire engine and equipment upgrades.
(4) Seventy-two thousand dollars ($72,000) to the Town of North Transylvania
Fire Rescue, Inc., a nonprofit organization, for emergency signal lights.
(5) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a full body scanner for the
Transylvania County Sheriff's Office to use at the jail.
SECTION 1.3.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twenty-eight million four hundred fifty-four thousand six
hundred ninety-seven dollars ($28,454,697) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to provide directed grants to the Transylvania County Board of Education to be used as follows:
(1) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for projects at StudyVille.
(2) Twenty-one million six hundred forty-seven thousand two hundred dollars
($21,647,200) for projects at Brevard High School.
(3) Six million seven hundred thirty-two thousand four hundred ninety-seven
dollars ($6,732,497) for projects at Rosman Elementary.

PART II. COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES
SECTION 2.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Southwestern
Community College to use as follows:
Page 2 House Bill 395-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the final phase of the Dental
Assisting/Hygiene building.
(2) Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) to complete the new
library, small business and offices center.
SECTION 2.2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of seventy-two million nine hundred twenty-four thousand one
hundred dollars ($72,924,100) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a
directed grant to Western Carolina University to use as follows:
(1) Four million one hundred thousand dollars ($4,100,000) for campus safety
infrastructure priorities, including implementing critical strategies to enhance
future disaster readiness.
(2) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) for infrastructure and site preparation costs
related to community housing and revitalization.
(3) Sixty-two million dollars ($62,000,000) for the completion of the engineering
building at the desired square footage to meet regional industry needs.
(4) Seven hundred ninety-two thousand one hundred dollars ($792,100) to meet
statutory compliance for Laboratory schools, including reimbursement for
relocation costs associated with the unexpected Jackson County Public School
eviction of the Catamount Laboratory School.
(5) Thirty-two thousand dollars ($32,000) for new, ongoing, and unbudgeted
operational costs.
SECTION 2.3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of nine million eight hundred thousand dollars ($9,800,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Southwestern
Community College for repair and renovation of the Almond Center.
SECTION 2.4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred nine million four hundred twenty thousand
dollars ($109,420,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed
grant to Blue Ridge Community College to use as follows:
(1) Fifty-one million dollars ($51,000,000) for facilities and capital needs of the
Transylvania County Campus.
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for budget stabilization and enrollment
recovery.
(3) One million five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,550,000) for multicampus
FTE relief.
(4) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for Hurricane Helene repairs and
infrastructure renovations.
(5) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) for a regional fire and rescue training
center.
(6) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for emergency shelter
upgrades.
(7) Six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to purchase and install generators.
(8) Three million one hundred thousand dollars ($3,100,000) for water and sewer
expansions.
(9) Two million four hundred thousand dollars ($2,400,000) for emergency grant
funding.
(10) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for tuition assistance.
(11) Three million two hundred seventy thousand dollars ($3,270,000) for program
expansion of skilled trades, including engineering, health sciences, and public
safety programs.

House Bill 395-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART III. OTHERS AND NONPROFIT REQUESTS
SECTION 3.1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($1,525,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide directed grants to
the following:
(1) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) to Fishes and Loaves Food Pantry, Inc., a
nonprofit organization, to provide free food to the residents of Jackson County
and surrounding areas.
(2) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) to Swain County Genealogical and
Historical Society, a nonprofit organization, for an outbuilding to provide
additional storage space.
(3) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to Blue Ridge
Parkway Foundation, a nonprofit organization, to ensure that the gateway
communities are ready for tourists as recovery from Hurricane Helene
continues.
SECTION 3.1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of eighteen million two hundred seventy-eight thousand six
hundred twenty-four dollars ($18,278,624) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
and the sum of ninety-one thousand three hundred seventy-two dollars ($91,372) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and two hundred twenty-three thousand eight hundred sixty
dollars ($223,860) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
the University of North Carolina at Asheville for the procurement, installation, operation, and
maintenance of three weather radar systems in locations across the State.
SECTION 3.1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Natural and Cultural Resources the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) for the North Carolina Science Museums Grant Program. These funds shall be used
to provide one-time grants to science museums in Western North Carolina that have been
engaged in relief efforts and whose normal operations were disrupted, causing a severe loss in
revenue due to the extensive damage caused by Hurricane Helene. Grant awards shall not exceed
twenty-five percent (25%) of the eligible museums' annual budget with the maximum awards not
exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). Any remaining funds shall be
distributed equally among participating museums after the initial grants are awarded. Eligible
museums include the following:
(1) Grandfather Mountain Nature Museum.
(2) Buncombe County Asheville Museum of Science.
(3) North Carolina Arboretum.
(4) Western North Carolina Nature Center.
(5) Henderson County Hands On! Children's Museum.
(6) Team ECCO Aquarium.
(7) Macon County Highlands Nature Center.
(8) Rutherford County KidSenses Children's Museum.
(9) Transylvania County Cradle of Forestry, FIND Outdoors.
(10) Pisgah Astronomical Research Institute.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 4 House Bill 395-First Edition